sk-SK: Montážny vzor volantu: Na 3 skrutky; Na 4 skrutky; Na 5 skrutiek; Na 6 skrutiek; Iné
sl-SI: Vzorec montaže volana: Na 3 vijake; Na 4 vijake; Na 5 vijakov; Na 6 vijakov; Drugo
ko: 스티어링 휠 장착 패턴: 3볼트; 4볼트; 5볼트; 6볼트; 기타
zh-CN: 方向盘孔位/安装模式: 3 螺栓; 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 其他
vi: Mẫu lắp đặt vô lăng: 3 bu-lông; 4 bu-lông; 5 bu-lông; 6 bu-lông; Khác
cs: Schéma montáže volantu: 3 šrouby; 4 šrouby; 5 šroubů; 6 šroubů; Jiné
pt-BR: Volante padrão de montagem: 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Outro
fr: Configuration de fixation du volant: À 3 boulons; À 4 boulons; À 5 boulons; À 6 boulons; Autre
tr: Direksiyon simidi montaj deseni: 3 cıvatalı; 4 cıvatalı; 5 cıvatalı; 6 cıvatalı; Diğer
bg-BG: Схема на монтаж на волана: С 3 болта; С 4 болта; С 5 болта; С 6 болта; Друго
sv: Rattmonteringsmönster: 3-bult; 4-bult; 5-bult; 6-bult; Övrigt
nb: Monteringsmønster for ratt: 3-bolt; 4-bolt; 5-bolt; 6-bolt; Annet
da: Monteringsmønster for rat: 3 bolte; 4 bolte; 5 bolte; 6 bolte; Andet
de: Befestigungsmuster des Lenkrads: 3-Loch; 4-Loch; 5-Loch; 6-Loch; Andere
ro-RO: Model al orificiilor de montare a volanului: 3 șuruburi; 4 șuruburi; 5 șuruburi; 6 șuruburi; Altele
it: Schema di montaggio del volante: A 3 bulloni; A 4 bulloni; A 5 bulloni; A 6 bulloni; Altro
pl: Wzorzec montażu kierownicy: Na 3 śruby; Na 4 śruby; Na 5 śrub; Na 6 śrub; Inny
el: Μοτίβο στερέωσης τιμονιού: 3 μπουλόνια; 4 μπουλόνια; 5 μπουλόνια; 6 μπουλόνια; Άλλο
fi: Ohjauspyörän kiinnityskuvio: 3-pulttinen; 4-pulttinen; 5-pulttinen; 6-pulttinen; Muu
lt-LT: Vairo tvirtinimo schema: 3 varžtai; 4 varžtai; 5 varžtai; 6 varžtai; Kita
pt-PT: Padrão de montagem do volante: 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Outro
nl: Stuurwiel montagepatroon: 3-bouts; 4-bouts; 5-bouts; 6-bouts; Overig
hu: Kormánykerék rögzítési formája: 3 csavaros; 4 csavaros; 5 csavaros; 6 csavaros; Egyéb
es: Patrón de montaje del volante: 3 pernos; 4 pernos; 5 pernos; 6 pernos; Otro
en: Steering wheel mounting pattern: 3 bolt; 4 bolt; 5 bolt; 6 bolt; Other
hr-HR: Uzorak za montažu volana: 3 vijka; 4 vijka; 5 vijaka; 6 vijaka; Ostalo
zh-TW: 方向盤安裝樣式: 3 螺栓; 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 其他
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งพวงมาลัย: น็อต 3 ตัว; น็อต 4 ตัว; น็อต 5 ตัว; น็อต 6 ตัว; อื่นๆ
ja: ステアリングホイール取付パターン: 3ボルト; 4ボルト; 5ボルト; 6ボルト; その他
ru: Монтажный шаблон рулевого колеса: 3 болта; 4 болта; 5 болтов; 6 болтов; Другое